Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB47.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6111(g)(5) and (6) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 6111. Sale or transfer of firearms.* * *(g) Penalties.--* * *(5) Notwithstanding section 306 (relating to liability for conduct of another; complicity) or any other statute to the contrary, any person, licensed importer, licensed dealer or licensed manufacturer who knowingly and intentionally sells, delivers or transfers a firearm in violation of this chapter [who has reason to believe that the firearm is intended to be used in the commission of a crime or attempt 12345678910111213141516171819 to commit a crime shall be criminally liable for such crime or attempted crime] shall be criminally liable for any crime or attempted crime in which the firearm is used.(6) Notwithstanding any act or statute to the contrary, any person, licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer who knowingly and intentionally sells or delivers a firearm in violation of this chapter [who has reason to believe that the firearm is intended to be used in the commission of a crime or attempt to commit a crime] shall be liable in the amount of the civil judgment for injuries suffered by any person [so injured by such crime or attempted crime] who is injured during any crime or attempted crime in which the firearm is used.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0047PN0020 - 2 - 123456789101112131415